Massachusetts, session 194th, H3268.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
Section 6 of chapter 64H of the General Laws, as appearing in the 2022 Official Edition,
is hereby amended by adding the following paragraph:-
(yy)(1) Notwithstanding any general or special law to the contrary, sales of non-
prescription breast pumps, baby lotions, baby oils, baby powders, infant supplies including baby
harnesses, carriages, strollers, car seats, restraints, changing tables, cribs and crib blankets,
diaper bags, nursing bottles, nipples, teething items or baby wipes.
(2)Notwithstanding any general or special law to the contrary, sales of certain apparel
products intended to be worn or carried on or about the human body by children 5 years of age
and younger, including children’s diapers, children’s clothing, children’s accessories and
of 2

children’s shoes. “Children’s clothing” shall include items intended to be worn or carried on or
about the human body by children 5 years of age and younger, such as shirts, pants, shorts,
dresses, skirts, coveralls, pajamas, socks, undergarments, suits, uniforms, outerwear, bathing
suits, costumes, and safety clothing. “Children’s accessories” shall include non-clothing items
that are intended to be worn or carried on or about the human body by children 5 years of age
and younger, such as gloves, hosiery, belts, bibs, hair accessories, scarves, ties and hats.
“Children’s accessories” shall not include items such as bags, wallets, jewelry, watches, fabrics,
sports equipment, umbrellas or wigs.
of 2